Indiana, session 2026, HB1058.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-4-3-3.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.7. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, if a proposed annexation territory consists of:
(1) land that:
(A) is contiguous to the municipality under section 1.5 of
this chapter; and
(B) abuts, at least in part, one (1) side of the railroad tracks
and railroad right-of-way; and
(2) land:
(A) that is not contiguous to the municipality under section
1.5 of this chapter; and
(B) that:
(i) is separated from the land under subdivision (1) by;
and
(ii) abuts, at least in part, the opposite side of;
the railroad tracks and railroad right-of-way described in
subdivision (1)(B);
the proposed annexation territory satisfies the contiguity
requirements under section 1.5 of this chapter. The annexing
municipality is not required to obtain the consent of any person
owning, leasing, operating, or using the railroad tracks or railroad
HEA 1058

2
right-of-way to annex the proposed territory.
(b) Nothing in this section authorizes the municipality to annex
the railroad tracks and railroad right-of-way abutting the
annexation territory.
HEA 1058

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1058